Hawaii statutes.
[§661B-7]
Exclusive remedy. (a) Notwithstanding
any other law, including the common law, to the contrary, this chapter sets
forth the exclusive remedy for any person seeking compensation of any kind or
nature whatsoever, as a result of, related to, or arising from a conviction and
imprisonment for crimes for which the person was actually innocent. This
section shall be strictly construed in favor of any person against whom a claim
is asserted, and against the person asserting the claim.

(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
should the petitioner die before a final judgment in the circuit court is
entered, the petitioner's claim shall abate in its entirety. [L 2016, c 156, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next